West Virginia, session 2025, SB757.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 7. Actions for Injuries. §55-7-33. Private cause of action for deprivation of rights under West Virginia law. (a) Every person who, under color of any state statute, state rule, or county or municipal ordinance, subjects, or causes to be subjected, any citizen of the State of West Virginia or other person within the jurisdiction thereof to the deprivation of any rights, privileges, or immunities secured by the West Virginia Constitution and laws of the state, shall be liable to the party injured in an action at law, suit in equity, or other proper proceeding for redress, including compensatory, nominal, and punitive damages, except that in any action brought against a judicial officer for an act or omission taken in such officer's judicial capacity, injunctive relief shall not be granted unless a declaratory decree was violated or declaratory relief was unavailable.(b) In a private cause of action brought pursuant to this section, the court, in its discretion, may allow the prevailing party reasonable attorney's fees and court costs, including but not limited to expert fees.